Washington statutes.
RCW 41.58.801

Transfer of reports, documents, records, property, etc., funds, appropriations, etc.

All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or other writings in the possession of the marine employee commission, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the state board for community and technical colleges, and the department of labor and industries and pertaining to the functions transferred to the commission by chapter 296, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess. shall by January 1, 1976, be delivered to the custody of the commission. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed in carrying out the functions transferred by chapter 296, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess. shall by January 1, 1976, be transferred to the commission.

Any appropriation or portion thereof remaining as of January 1, 1976, and which is made to an agency for the purpose of carrying out functions transferred from such agency pursuant to chapter 296, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess., shall, by January 1, 1976, be transferred and credited to the commission for the purpose of carrying out such functions. This paragraph shall not affect the transfer of moneys prior to January 1, 1976, pursuant to section 67, chapter 269, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess.

Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any funds, including unexpended balances within any accounts, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or any other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the performance of the functions transferred under chapter 296, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess., the director of financial management or his or her successor shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

[ 2012 c 117 s 90; 1979 c 151 s 66; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 5 s 4.]